testing/som-tests.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../bin/som-gen.hfst
    Morph: ../bin/som-vh.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../bin/isom.fst
    Morph: ../bin/som.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - blabla: # a-stems
    blabla+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Abs: blabla
    blabla+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Nom: blablam
    blabla+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Gen: blablak
    blabla+N+Masc+Indef+Sg+Voc: blablap
    blabla+N+Masc+Indef+Pl+Abs: blabla
    blabla+N+Masc+Indef+Pl+Nom: blabla
    blabla+N+Masc+Indef+Pl+Gen: blabla
    blabla+N+Masc+Indef+Pl+Voc: blabla
    blabla+N+Masc+Def+Sg+Abs: blabla
    blabla+N+Masc+Def+Sg+Nom: blabla
    blabla+N+Masc+Def+Sg+Gen: blabla
    blabla+N+Masc+Def+Sg+Voc: blabla
    blabla+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Abs: blabla
    blabla+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Nom: blabla
    blabla+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Gen: blabla
    blabla+N+Masc+Def+Pl+Voc: blabla
